Washington statutes.
RCW 36.57.040

Powers and duties.

Every county transportation authority created to perform the function of public transportation pursuant to RCW 36.57.020 shall have the following powers:

(1) To prepare, adopt, carry out, and amend a general comprehensive plan for public transportation service.

(2) To acquire by purchase, condemnation, gift, or grant and to lease, construct, add to, improve, replace, repair, maintain, operate, and regulate the use of any transportation facilities and properties, including terminal and parking facilities, together with all lands, rights-of-way, property, equipment, and accessories necessary for such systems and facilities.

(3) To fix rates, tolls, fares, and charges for the use of such facilities and to establish various routes and classes of service. Fares or charges may be adjusted or eliminated for any distinguishable class of users including, but not limited to[,] senior citizens, persons with disabilities, and students.

(4) If a county transit authority extends its transportation function to any area in which service is already offered by any company holding a certificate of public convenience and necessity from the Washington utilities and transportation commission under RCW 81.68.040, to acquire by purchase or condemnation at the fair market value, from the person holding the existing certificate for providing the services, that portion of the operating authority and equipment representing the services within the area of public operation, or to contract with such person or corporation to continue to operate such service or any part thereof for time and upon such terms and conditions as provided by contract.

(5)(a) To contract with the United States or any agency thereof, any state or agency thereof, any metropolitan municipal corporation, any other county, city, special district, or governmental agency and any private person, firm, or corporation for the purpose of receiving gifts or grants or securing loans or advances for preliminary planning and feasibility studies, or for the design, construction, operation, or maintenance of transportation facilities and ambulance services: PROVIDED, That before the authority enters into any such contract for the provision of ambulance service, it shall submit to the voters a proposition authorizing such contracting authority, and a majority of those voting thereon shall have approved the proposition; and

(b) To contract with any governmental agency or with any private person, firm, or corporation for the use by either contracting party of all or any part of the facilities, structures, lands, interests in lands, air rights over lands, and rights-of-way of all kinds which are owned, leased, or held by the other party and for the purpose of planning, constructing, or operating any facility or performing any service related to transportation which the county is authorized to operate or perform, on such terms as may be agreed upon by the contracting parties: PROVIDED, That before any contract for the lease or operation of any transportation facilities shall be let to any private person, firm, or corporation, competitive bids shall first be called for and contracts awarded in accord with the procedures established in accord with RCW 36.32.240, 36.32.250, and 36.32.270.

(6) In addition to all other powers and duties, an authority shall have the power to own, construct, purchase, lease, add to, and maintain any real and personal property or property rights necessary for the conduct of the affairs of the authority. An authority may sell, lease, convey, or otherwise dispose of any authority real or personal property no longer necessary for the conduct of the affairs of the authority. An authority may enter into contracts to carry out the provisions of this section.

[ 2020 c 274 s 17; 1982 c 10 s 6. Prior: 1981 c 319 s 2; 1981 c 25 s 3; 1974 ex.s. c 167 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 10: See note following RCW 6.13.080.